Massachusetts, session 194th, S791.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 33. The commission shall provide to any active or retired employee of the
commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for accessing
nature as a medical treatment when prescribed pursuant to section 42E of chapter 112, as mental
health services when prescribed pursuant to section 42F of said chapter 112 and as social
rehabilitation services when referred pursuant to section 42G of said chapter 112.
SECTION 2. Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 42D the following 3 sections:- Section 42E. Any person authorized to
prescribe or dispense of controlled substances pursuant to section 9 of chapter 94C may, when
acting in accordance with any provision of this chapter and in good faith and in the course of a
professional practice for the alleviation of pain and suffering or for the treatment or alleviation of
of 5

disease, prescribe outdoor time for accessing nature as may reasonably be required for the
purpose of patient treatment.
Section 42F. Any persons licensed in the Commonwealth to provide counseling or other
mental health services pursuant to this chapter may, when acting in accordance with any
provision of this chapter and in good faith and in the course of a professional practice for the
treatment or alleviation of mental health symptoms, prescribe outdoor time for accessing nature
as may reasonably be required for the purpose of client treatment.
Section 42G. Any persons licensed to provide social services to individuals experiencing
social or emotional trauma including, but not limited to, job loss, divorce, food insecurity,
immigration or probation may, when acting in good faith and in the course of a professional
practice to meet the needs of community members, refer clients to outdoor time for accessing
nature as may reasonably be beneficial to their social rehabilitation.
SECTION 3. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 10Q the following section:-
Section 10R. The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall
provide coverage for accessing nature as a medical treatment when prescribed pursuant to
section 42E of chapter 112, as mental health services when prescribed pursuant to section 42F of
said chapter 112 and as social rehabilitation services when referred pursuant to section 42G of
said chapter 112.
of 5

SECTION 4. Section 7 of Chapter 132A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding the provisions of the first paragraph, the commissioner shall waive all
fees and other charges for the parking of vehicles and for the enjoyment of other special
privileges within the territory under the control of the division for those individuals enrolled in
MassHealth.
SECTION 5. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 47TT the following section:-
Section 47UU. An individual policy of accident, sickness or mental health insurance
issued under section 108 that provides hospital expense, surgical expense or mental health
expense insurance or a group blanket or general policy of accident, sickness or mental health
insurance issued under section 110 that provides hospital expense, surgical expense or mental
health insurance that is issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide
coverage for accessing nature as a medical treatment when prescribed pursuant to section 42E of
chapter 112, as mental health services when prescribed pursuant to section 42F of said chapter
112 and as social rehabilitation services when referred pursuant to section 42G of said chapter
112.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 8UU the following section:-
Section 8VV. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall provide coverage for accessing nature as a medical treatment when prescribed pursuant to
of 5

section 42E of chapter 112, as mental health services when prescribed pursuant to section 42F of
said chapter 112 and as social rehabilitation services when referred pursuant to section 42G of
said chapter 112.
SECTION 7. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4UU the following section:-
Section 4VV. A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical or mental
health service agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
coverage for accessing nature as a medical treatment when prescribed pursuant to section 42E of
chapter 112, as mental health services when prescribed pursuant to section 42F of said chapter
112 and as social rehabilitation services when referred pursuant to section 42G of said chapter
112.
SECTION 8. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4MM the following section:-
Section 4NN. An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or
renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for accessing nature as a
medical treatment when prescribed pursuant to section 42E of chapter 112, as mental health
services when prescribed pursuant to section 42F of said chapter 112 and as social rehabilitation
services when referred pursuant to section 42G of said chapter 112.
SECTION 9. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commissioner of the department of public health and the commissioner of the department of
conservation and recreation shall jointly review existing programs and budgets to identify
opportunities for collaboration on developing and implementing outdoor environmental,
of 5

ecological, agricultural and other natural resource or outdoor-based therapy programs. This
review shall include evaluation of the equitable access to existing natural resource areas and
strategies for ensuring that black, indigenous and people of color, environmental justice and
other underrepresented community members feel safe and welcome when visiting these natural
resource areas.
(b) The commissioner of the department of public health and the commissioner of the
department of conservation and recreation shall jointly submit a report of their review and
findings by filing the report with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate not
later than September 30, 2024.
SECTION 10. This act shall be known as the H.E.R.O. Nurturing Center Making Nature
Prescriptive Act
of 5